District of Columbia statutes.
50-905

Transfers.

(a)

All positions, personnel, property, records, and unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds available or to be made available to the Department of Public Works for the vehicle and driver licensing, registration, and control functions set out in Reorganization Plan No. 4 of 1983 (part D of subchapter VI of Chapter 15 of Title 1), effective March 1, 1984, are hereby transferred to the Department of Motor Vehicles.

(b)

All of the functions assigned, and authorities delegated to the Department of Public Works, with respect to issuing regulations for and administering motor vehicle services, except for parking services functions, as set forth in section III(H) of Reorganization Plan No. 4 of 1983, effective March 1, 1984 (including only vehicle and driver licensing, registration, and control) are hereby transferred to the Department of Motor Vehicles.

History

Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-175, § 1826, 45 DCR 7193
Apr. 12, 2000, D.C. Law 13-91, § 151(b), 47 DCR 520

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 40-155.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 13-91 validated a previously made technical amendment in subsec. (a).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary addition of chapter, see note to § 50-901.
For temporary (90-day) addition of Chapter 1A, see notes following § 50-901.

Editor's Notes

Application of D.C. Law 12-175: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 50-901.